Texas statutes.
FINANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMERS OF FINANCIAL SERVICES

CHAPTER 391. FURNISHING FALSE CREDIT INFORMATION

Sec. 391.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "credit reporting bureau" means a person who engages in the practice of assembling or reporting credit information about individuals for the purpose of furnishing the information to a third party.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1008, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 391.002. FURNISHING FALSE INFORMATION; PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly furnishes false information about another person's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity to a credit reporting bureau.

(b) A credit reporting bureau commits an offense if the credit reporting bureau knowingly furnishes false information about a person's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity to a third party.

(c) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $200.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1008, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.